Hawaii statutes.
§40-59 Comptroller to keep list of
salaries, contracts, bids, etc. The comptroller shall keep in the
comptroller's office in a convenient form for easy reference a correct list of
all state permanent settlements, specific salaries, payrolls, subsidies, rents,
contracts, and all bids for materials and supplies; and in auditing all bills
for service rendered or merchandise supplied, or other bills against the State,
the comptroller shall compare all rates and prices charged with the list, and
disallow all amounts in excess of the current rates and prices, as shown by the
list, or that in the comptroller's judgment are excessive. [L 1898, c 39, §23;
RL 1925, §1455; RL 1935, §582; RL 1945, §1586; RL 1955, §34-36; am L 1957, c
152, §1; HRS §40-59; am L 1975, c 78, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next